Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB521.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 508.130 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section[KRS 508.130 to 508.150], unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) (a) [To "stalk" means to engage in an intentional course of conduct:
1. Directed at a specific person or persons;
2. Which seriously alarms, annoys, intimidates, or harasses the person or persons; and
3. Which serves no legitimate purpose.
(b) The course of conduct shall be that which would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial mental
distress.
(2) ]1. "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of two (2) or more acts, evidencing a
continuity of purpose.
2. One (1) or more of these acts may include:
a. Those by which a person, directly or indirectly, by any means or method:
i. Follows, monitors, observes, surveils, or threatens another person; or
ii. Interferes with another person's property; or
b. The use of any equipment, instrument, machine, or other device by which communication
or information is transmitted, including but not limited to:
i. Computers;[,]
ii. The internet, internet applications, social media platforms, email, text messages,
instant messages, or any other electronic network;[,]
iii. Cameras or other recording devices;[,]
iv. Telephones or other personal communications devices;[,]
v. Scanners or other copying devices;[,] and
vi. Any device that enables the use of a transmitting device.
3. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of "course of conduct." If
the defendant claims that he or she was engaged in constitutionally protected activity, the court
shall determine the validity of that claim as a matter of law and, if found valid, shall exclude that
activity from evidence;[.]
(b)[(3)] "Protective order" means:
1.[(a)] An emergency protective order or domestic violence order issued under KRS 403.715 to
403.785;
2.[(b)] A foreign protective order, as defined in KRS 403.720 and 456.010;
3.[(c)] An order issued under KRS 431.064;
4.[(d)] An interpersonal protective[A restraining] order issued in accordance with KRS 508.155 or
510.037;
5.[(e)] An order of protection as defined in KRS 403.720 and 456.010;[ and]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
6. A civil restraining order issued by a court of this Commonwealth or any other state on the
basis of domestic violence and abuse as defined in KRS 403.720 or dating violence and abuse
as defined in KRS 456.010; or
7.[(f)] Any condition of a bond, conditional release, probation, parole, or pretrial diversion order
designed to protect the victim from the offender; and[.]
(c) "Social media platform" means a website or application that is open to the public, allows a user to
create an account, and enables users to do all of the following:
1. Interact socially with other users within the confines of the website or application;
2. Construct a public or semipublic profile for the purpose of signing into and using the website
or application;
3. Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares or has the ability to share a
social connection within the website or application; and
4. Create or post content viewable by others, including on message boards, chat rooms, video
channels, direct or private messages, or chats, or on a landing page or main feed that presents
the user with content generated by other users.
(2) A person is guilty of stalking when he or she:
(a) Intentionally engages in a course of conduct directed at another person or persons that:
1. Seriously alarms, annoys, intimidates, or harasses the other person or persons;
2. Serves no legitimate purpose; and
3. Causes the other person or persons to suffer substantial mental distress, including but not
limited to interference with the person's sense of safety or well-being; and
(b) Consciously disregards a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the course of conduct would cause
the other person or persons to suffer substantial mental distress.
(3) Stalking is a Class D felony unless:
(a) A protective order has been issued by the court to protect the same victim or victims and the
defendant has been served with the summons or order or has been given actual notice;
(b) A criminal complaint is currently pending with a court, law enforcement agency, or prosecutor by the
same victim or victims and the defendant has been served with a summons or warrant or has been
given actual notice;
(c) The defendant has been convicted of or pled guilty within the previous five (5) years to a felony or to
a Class A misdemeanor against the same victim or victims;
(d) The act or acts were committed while the defendant had a deadly weapon on or about his or her
person; or
(e) The defendant's act or acts place the victim or victims in reasonable fear of:
1. Sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010;
2. Physical injury; or
3. Death;
in which case it is a Class C felony.
Section 2. KRS 511.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used[The following definitions apply] in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Building," in addition to its ordinary meaning, means any structure, vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft:
(a) Where any person lives; or
(b) Where people assemble for purposes of business, government, education, religion, entertainment, or
public transportation.

CHAPTER 67 3
Each unit of a building consisting of two (2) or more units separately secured or occupied is a separate
building;[.]
(2) "Dwelling" means a building which is usually occupied by a person lodging therein;[.]
(3) "Employee" has the same meaning as in KRS 338.015;
(4) "Employer" has the same meaning as in KRS 338.015;
(5)[(3)] "Premises" includes a[the term] ["]building["] as defined in this section,[herein] and any real
property;[.]
(6) "Threatening behavior" means behavior intentionally engaged in by a person that places another person in
reasonable apprehension of imminent physical injury; and
(7) "Workplace" means any property that is owned, leased, or controlled by an employer where the employer's
official business is conducted and where one (1) or more of the employer's employees perform employment
duties.
Section 3. KRS 511.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the second degree when he or she knowingly enters or remains:
(a) Unlawfully in a building or upon premises as to which notice against trespass is given by fencing or
other enclosure; or
(b) In a workplace, while engaging in threatening behavior, as to which notice against trespass is given
verbally or in writing by the applicable employer, an employee with the employer's authorization, or
an authorized agent of the employer.
(2) For the purposes of this section, notice against trespass includes the placement of identifying purple paint
marks on trees or posts on the property if the marks are:
(a) Vertical lines of not less than eight (8) inches in length and not less than one (1) inch in width;
(b) Placed so that the bottom of the mark is not less than three (3) feet from the ground nor more than five
(5) feet from the ground; and
(c) Placed at locations that are readily visible to any person approaching the property and no more than:
1. One hundred (100) feet apart on forest land; or
2. One thousand (1,000) feet apart on land other than forest land.
(3) Criminal trespass in the second degree is a Class B misdemeanor, unless:
(a) The offense occurs during a declared emergency as defined by KRS 39A.020 arising from a natural or
man-made disaster, within the area covered by the emergency declaration, and within the area impacted
by the disaster[, in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor]; or
(b) A person commits a second or subsequent offense within three (3) years of the prior offense;
in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor.
Section 4. KRS 511.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the third degree when he or she knowingly enters or remains
unlawfully in or upon premises.
(2) Criminal trespass in the third degree is a violation, unless:
(a) The offense occurs during a declared emergency as defined by KRS 39A.020 arising from a natural or
man-made disaster, within the area covered by the emergency declaration, and within the area impacted
by the disaster[, in which case it is a Class B misdemeanor]; or
(b) A person commits a second or subsequent offense within three (3) years of the prior offense;
in which case it is a Class B misdemeanor.
Section 5. KRS 14.300 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
As used in KRS 14.300 to 14.318 unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Address" means a residential street address, school address, or work address of an individual, as specified on
the application of an individual to be a program participant under this section;
(2) "Applicant" means a person applying for certification in the Safe at Home Program under KRS 14.300 to
14.318;
(3) "Application assistant" means a private individual, employee or volunteer of a government agency, or an
employee or volunteer of a nonprofit program that provides counseling, referral, shelter, or other specialized
service to victims of domestic violence, rape, sexual assault, human trafficking, stalking, or other crimes, who
has been designated by the respective agency or program, and who has been trained and registered by the
Secretary of State to assist individuals in establishing a safety program and in the completion of program
applications;
(4) "Criminal offense against a victim who is a minor" has the same meaning as in KRS 17.500;
(5) "Domestic violence and abuse" has the same meaning as in KRS 403.720;
(6) "Human trafficking" means an offense or attempt to commit an offense as defined in:
(a) KRS 529.100;
(b) 18 U.S.C. sec. 1589;
(c) 18 U.S.C. sec. 1592;
(d) 22 U.S.C. sec. 7102(8);
(e) 22 U.S.C. sec. 7102(11); or
(f) 22 U.S.C. sec. 7102(12);
(7) "Program participant" means a person certified as a program participant under KRS 14.300 to 14.318;
(8) "Sex crime" means an offense or an attempt to commit an offense defined in:
(a) KRS Chapter 510;
(b) KRS 530.020;
(c) KRS 530.064(1)(a);
(d) KRS 531.120;
(e) KRS 531.310;
(f) KRS 531.320; or
(g) Any criminal attempt to commit an offense specified in this subsection, regardless of the penalty for the
attempt;
(9) "Specified offense" means:
(a) Domestic violence and abuse;
(b) Stalking;
(c) A sex crime;
(d) Human trafficking;
(e) A criminal offense against a victim who is a minor;
(f) A similar federal offense; or
(g) A similar offense from another state or territory; and
(10) "Stalking" means conduct prohibited under Section 1 of this Act[KRS 508.140 and 508.150].
Section 6. KRS 23A.208 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to fees created by KRS 23A.205, 23A.206, and 23A.2065, an administrative fee of thirty dollars
($30) shall be added to the costs that the defendant is required to pay for the following crimes:

CHAPTER 67 5
(a) A sex crime, meaning an offense described in:
1. KRS Chapter 510;
2. KRS 530.020;
3. KRS 530.064(1)(a);
4. KRS 531.310; and
5. KRS 531.320;
(b) Stalking, meaning conduct prohibited under Section 1 of this Act[KRS 508.140 and 508.150]; and
(c) A criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crimes set forth in this
subsection.
(2) The first one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) of each fee collected under this section shall be placed into the
general fund, and the remainder of the fee shall be allocated by the clerk of the court on a quarterly basis to the
Safe at Home Program fund established in KRS 14.260 to be used solely to establish, operate, and maintain the
Safe at Home Program established in KRS 14.302.
(3) The court may waive all or any portion of the fee required by this section if the court finds that a person
subject to the surcharge is indigent or financially unable to pay all or any portion of the surcharge. The court
may waive only the portion of the surcharge that the court finds the person is financially unable to pay.
Section 7. KRS 24A.178 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to fees created by KRS 24A.175, 24A.176, and 24A.1765, an administrative fee of thirty dollars
($30) shall be added to the costs that the defendant is required to pay for the following crimes:
(a) A sex crime, meaning an offense described in:
1. KRS Chapter 510;
2. KRS 530.020;
3. KRS 530.064(1)(a);
4. KRS 531.310; and
5. KRS 531.320;
(b) Stalking, meaning conduct prohibited under Section 1 of this Act[KRS 508.140 and 508.150]; and
(c) A criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crimes set forth in this
subsection.
(2) The first one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) of each fee collected under this section shall be placed into the
general fund, and the remainder of the fee shall be allocated by the clerk of the court on a quarterly basis to the
Safe at Home Program fund established in KRS 14.260 to be used solely to establish, operate, and maintain the
Safe at Home Program established in KRS 14.302.
(3) The court may waive all or any portion of the fee required by this section if the court finds that a person
subject to the surcharge is indigent or financially unable to pay all or any portion of the surcharge. The court
may waive only the portion of the surcharge that the court finds the person is financially unable to pay.
Section 8. KRS 431.005 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A peace officer may make an arrest:
(a) In obedience to a warrant; or
(b) Without a warrant when a felony is committed in his or her presence; or
(c) Without a warrant when he or she has probable cause to believe that the person being arrested has
committed a felony; or
(d) Without a warrant when a misdemeanor, as defined in KRS 431.060, has been committed in his or her
presence; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(e) Without a warrant when a violation of KRS 189.290, 189.393, 189.520, 189.580, 511.080, or 525.070
has been committed in his or her presence, except that a violation of KRS 189A.010 or KRS 281A.210
need not be committed in his or her presence in order to make an arrest without a warrant if the officer
has probable cause to believe that the person being arrested has violated KRS 189A.010 or KRS
281A.210;
(f) Without a warrant when a violation of KRS 508.030 has occurred in a hospital without the officer's
presence if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person being arrested has violated KRS
508.030. As used in this paragraph, "hospital" includes any property owned or used by a hospital as a
parking lot or parking garage; or
(g) Without a warrant when a violation of KRS 235.240(2) has occurred causing an accident, occurring
outside of the peace officer's presence, involving a motorboat or vessel on the waters of the
Commonwealth, and resulting in a physical injury or property damage, and a commissioned peace
officer has probable cause to determine who the operator of the motorboat or vessel was and that
operator was intoxicated or under the influence of any substance that impairs one's ability to operate the
motorboat or vessel at the time of the accident.
(2) (a) Any peace officer may arrest a person without warrant when the peace officer has probable cause to
believe that the person has intentionally or wantonly caused physical injury to a family member,
member of an unmarried couple, or another person with whom the person was or is in a dating
relationship.
(b) As used in this subsection, "dating relationship," "family member," and "member of an unmarried
couple" have the same meanings as [defined ]in KRS 403.720 and 456.010.[
(c) For the purpose of this subsection, the term "member of an unmarried couple" has the same meaning as
set out in KRS 403.720.]
(3) A peace officer may arrest a person without a warrant when the peace officer has probable cause to believe
that the person is a sexual offender who has failed to comply with the Kentucky Sex Offender Registry
requirements based upon information received from the Law Information Network of Kentucky.
(4) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a "peace officer" is an officer certified pursuant to KRS
15.380 to 15.404.
(5) If a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a person has violated a condition of release
imposed in accordance with KRS 431.064 and verifies that the alleged violator has notice of the conditions,
the officer shall, without a warrant, arrest the alleged violator whether the violation was committed in or
outside the presence of the officer.
(6) A private person may make an arrest when a felony has been committed in fact and he or she has probable
cause to believe that the person being arrested has committed it.
(7) If a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a person has violated an interpersonal
protective[a restraining] order issued under KRS 508.155, then the officer shall, without a warrant, arrest the
alleged violator whether the violation was committed in or outside the presence of the officer.
Section 9. KRS 411.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A civil action may be maintained under this section against any person who commits the conduct prohibited
under Section 1 of this Act,[KRS 508.140 or 508.150. A civil action may be maintained under this section]
whether or not the individual who is alleged to have violated Section 1 of this Act[KRS 508.140 or 508.150]
has been charged or convicted of the alleged crime.
(2) The action may be:
(a) Brought by a victim or a victim's parent or legal guardian on behalf of a victim who is a minor; and
(b) Filed in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the alleged violation occurred or the
county where the victim resides.
(3) Liability under this section shall include the actual damages caused by the violation and may include punitive
damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees.
(4) An action under this section shall be brought within two (2) years of the last act of conduct in violation of this
section.

CHAPTER 67 7
Section 10. KRS 456.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Dating relationship" means a relationship between individuals who have or have had a relationship of a
romantic or intimate nature. It does not include a casual acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization in a
business or social context. The following factors may be considered in addition to any other relevant factors in
determining whether the relationship is or was of a romantic or intimate nature:
(a) Declarations of romantic interest;
(b) The relationship was characterized by the expectation of affection;
(c) Attendance at social outings together as a couple;
(d) The frequency and type of interaction between the persons, including whether the persons have been
involved together over time and on a continuous basis during the course of the relationship;
(e) The length and recency of the relationship; and
(f) Other indications of a substantial connection that would lead a reasonable person to understand that a
dating relationship existed;
(2) "Dating violence and abuse" means:
(a) Physical injury, serious physical injury, stalking, sexual assault, strangulation, or the infliction of fear of
imminent physical injury, serious physical injury, sexual assault[abuse], strangulation, or assault
occurring between persons who are or have been in a dating relationship; or
(b) Any conduct prohibited by KRS 525.125, 525.130, 525.135, or 525.137, or the infliction of fear of such
imminent conduct, taken against a domestic animal when used as a method of coercion, control,
punishment, intimidation, or revenge directed against a person with whom the perpetrator is or has been
in a dating relationship, when that person has a close bond of affection to the domestic animal;
(3) "Domestic animal" means a dog, cat, or other animal that is domesticated and kept as a household pet, but does
not include animals normally raised for agricultural or commercial purposes;
(4) "Foreign protective order" means any judgment, decree, or order of protection which is entitled to full faith
and credit pursuant to 18 U.S.C. sec. 2265 which was not issued on the basis of domestic violence and abuse;
(5) "Global positioning monitoring system" means a system that electronically determines a person's location
through a device worn by the person which does not invade his or her bodily integrity and which transmits the
person's latitude and longitude data to a monitoring entity;
(6) "Order of protection" means any interpersonal protective order, including those issued on a temporary basis,
and includes a foreign protective order;
(7) "Sexual assault" refers to conduct prohibited as any degree of rape, sodomy, or sexual abuse under KRS
Chapter 510 or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit any degree of rape,
sodomy, or sexual abuse, or incest under KRS 530.020;
(8) "Stalking" refers to conduct prohibited as stalking under Section 1 of this Act[KRS 508.140 or 508.150], or a
criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crime of stalking;
(9) "Strangulation" refers to conduct prohibited by KRS 508.170 and 508.175, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy,
facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crime of strangulation; and
(10) "Substantial violation" means criminal conduct which involves actual or threatened harm to the person, family,
or property, including a domestic animal, of an individual protected by an order of protection.
Section 11. KRS 500.092 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 500.090, all personal property which is not used as a permanent residence in this
state which is used in connection with or acquired as a result of a violation or attempted violation of any
of the statutes set out in subsection (3) of this section shall be subject to forfeiture under the same terms,
conditions, and defenses and using the same process as set out in KRS 218A.405 to 218A.460 for
property subject to forfeiture under that chapter.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 500.090, all real and personal property in this state which is used in connection
with or acquired as a result of a violation or attempted violation of KRS 531.310 or 531.320 shall be
subject to forfeiture under the same terms, conditions, and defenses and using the same process as set
out in KRS 218A.405 to 218A.460 for property subject to forfeiture under that chapter.
(2) Administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 218A.420 shall govern expenditures derived from
forfeitures under this section to the same extent that they govern expenditures from forfeitures under KRS
218A.405 to 218A.460.
(3) The following offenses may trigger forfeiture of personal property under subsection (1)(a) of this section:
(a) KRS 17.546;
(b) Section 1 of this Act[KRS 508.140 and 508.150] involving the use of any equipment, instrument,
machine, or other device by which communication or information is transmitted, including computers,
the internet or other electronic network, cameras or other recording devices, telephones or other
personal communications devices, scanners or other copying devices, and any device that enables the
use of a transmitting device;
(c) KRS 510.155;
(d) KRS 530.064(1)(a);
(e) KRS 531.030;
(f) KRS 531.040
(g) KRS 531.310;
(h) KRS 531.320;
(i) KRS 531.335;
(j) KRS 531.340;
(k) KRS 531.350;
(l) KRS 531.360; and
(m) KRS 531.370.
Section 12. KRS 500.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In any investigation relating to an offense involving KRS 510.155, 530.064(1)(a), 531.030, 531.040,
531.310, 531.320, 531.335, 531.340, 531.350, 531.360, or 531.370, and upon reasonable cause to
believe that an internet service provider, social networking company, mobile payment service, or cloud
storage service has been used in the exploitation or attempted exploitation of children, or in any
investigation of a violation of KRS 17.546, Section 1 of this Act[508.140, 508.150], 525.070, or
525.080 where there is reasonable cause to believe that an internet service provider, social networking
company, mobile payment service, or cloud storage service has been used in the commission of the
offense, the Attorney General may issue in writing and cause to be served a subpoena requiring the
production and testimony described in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) In any investigation relating to an offense involving KRS 510.155, 530.064(1)(a), 531.030, 531.040,
531.310, 531.320, 531.335, 531.340, 531.350, 531.360, or 531.370, and upon reasonable cause to
believe that an internet service provider, social networking company, mobile payment service, or cloud
storage service has been used in the exploitation or attempted exploitation of children, the
commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police may issue in writing and cause to be served a
subpoena requiring the production and testimony described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a subpoena issued under this section may require the
production of any records or other documentation relevant to the investigation, including:
(a) Electronic mail address;
(b) Internet username;
(c) Internet protocol address;
(d) Name of account holder;

CHAPTER 67 9
(e) Billing and service address;
(f) Telephone number;
(g) Account status;
(h) Method of access to the internet; and
(i) Automatic number identification records if access is by modem.
(3) The internet service provider, social networking company, mobile payment service, cloud storage service, or
provider of electronic communication service or remote computing service shall not disclose the following
pursuant to a subpoena issued under this section but shall disclose the information in obedience to a warrant:
(a) In-transit electronic communications;
(b) Account memberships related to internet groups, newsgroups, mailing lists, or specific areas of interest;
(c) Account passwords; and
(d) Account content including:
1. Electronic mail in any form;
2. Address books, contacts, or buddy lists;
3. Financial records;
4. Internet proxy content or web surfing history; and
5. Files or other digital documents stored with the account or pursuant to use of the account.
(4) At any time before the return date specified on the subpoena, the person summoned may, in the District Court
in which the person resides or does business, petition for an order modifying or setting aside the subpoena, or a
prohibition of disclosure by a court.
(5) A subpoena under this section shall describe the objects required to be produced and shall prescribe a return
date with a reasonable period of time within which the objects can be assembled and made available.
(6) If no case or proceeding arises from the production of records or other documentation pursuant to this section
within a reasonable time after those records or documentation are[is] produced, the Attorney General shall
either destroy the records and documentation or return them to the person who produced them.
(7) A subpoena issued under this section may be served by any person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age
and who is designated in the subpoena to serve it. Service upon a natural person may be made by personal
delivery of the subpoena to him or her. Service may be made upon a corporation or partnership or other
unincorporated association which is subject to suit under its common name, by delivering the subpoena to an
officer, to a managing or general agent, or to any other agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive
service of process. The affidavit of the person serving the subpoena together with a true copy thereof shall be
proof of service.
(8) Except as provided in this section any information, records or data reported or obtained pursuant to subpoena
under this section shall remain confidential and shall not be further disclosed unless in connection with a
criminal case related to the subpoenaed materials.
Section 13. KRS 506.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a defendant is alleged by the prosecuting attorney to have been a member of a criminal gang as defined in
KRS 506.135, at the time of the commission of the offense, upon conviction of the offense there shall be a
separate proceeding from that proceeding which resulted in the defendant's conviction if the defendant was
convicted of:
(a) Assault in the fourth degree under KRS 508.030;
(b) Menacing under KRS 508.050;
(c) Wanton endangerment in the second degree under KRS 508.070;
(d) Terroristic threatening in the third degree under KRS 508.080;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(e) [Stalking in the second degree under KRS 508.150;
(f) ]Unlawful imprisonment in the second degree under KRS 509.030;
(f)[(g)] Criminal coercion under KRS 509.080;
(g)[(h)] Criminal mischief in the second degree under KRS 512.030;
(h)[(i)] Obstructing governmental operations under KRS 519.020;
(i)[(j)] Resisting arrest under KRS 520.090;
(j)[(k)] Riot in the second degree under KRS 525.030;
(k)[(l)] Inciting to riot under KRS 525.040;
(l)[(m)] Harassment under KRS 525.070;
(m)[(n)] Harassing communications under KRS 525.080;
(n)[(o)] The misdemeanor offense of carrying a concealed deadly weapon in violation of KRS 527.020;
or
(o)[(p)] Possession of a handgun by a minor as a first offense under KRS 527.100.
(2) The proceeding described in subsection (1) of this section shall be conducted before the court sitting with the
jury that found the defendant guilty of the offense unless the court for good cause discharges that jury and
impanels a new jury for that purpose. If the jury determines beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant is or
was a member of a criminal gang, acting for the purpose of benefitting, promoting, or furthering the interest of
a criminal gang at the time he or she committed the offense, he or she shall not be released for a minimum of
seventy-six (76) to ninety (90) days of the sentence imposed if the offense he or she is convicted of is
classified as a Class B misdemeanor, or for a minimum of three hundred eleven (311) to three hundred sixty-
five (365) days if the offense he or she is convicted of is classified as a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) This section shall not apply to a juvenile unless he or she has been transferred to Circuit Court as a youthful
offender pursuant to KRS 640.010 and has on at least one (1) prior separate occasion been adjudicated a public
offender for a felony offense.
Section 14. KRS 508.155 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) (a) Before January 1, 2016, a verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty to KRS 508.140 or 508.150 shall operate
as an application for a restraining order utilizing the provisions of this section and limiting the contact of the
defendant and the victim who was stalked, unless the victim requests otherwise.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2016, ]A verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty to Section 1 of this Act[KRS 508.140 or
508.150] shall operate as an application for an interpersonal protective order issued under KRS Chapter 456, unless
the victim requests otherwise. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapter 456:
(1)[1.] An interpersonal protective order requested under this subsection may be issued by the court that entered the
judgment of conviction;
(2)[2.] The judgment of conviction shall constitute sufficient cause for the entry of the order without the necessity of
further proof being taken; and
(3)[3.] The order may be effective for up to ten (10) years, with further renewals in increments of up to ten (10)
years[.
(2) The court shall give the defendant notice of his or her right to request a hearing on the application for a
restraining order. If the defendant waives his or her right to a hearing on this matter, then the court may issue
the restraining order without a hearing.
(3) If the defendant requests a hearing, it shall be held at the time of the verdict or plea of guilty, unless the victim
or defendant requests otherwise. The hearing shall be held in the court where the verdict or plea of guilty was
entered.
(4) A restraining order may grant the following specific relief:
(a) An order restraining the defendant from entering the residence, property, school, or place of employment of
the victim; or

CHAPTER 67 11
(b) An order restraining the defendant from making contact with the victim, including an order forbidding the
defendant from personally, or through an agent, initiating any communication likely to cause serious alarm,
annoyance, intimidation, or harassment, including but not limited to personal, written, telephonic, or any other
form of written or electronic communication or contact with the victim. An order issued pursuant to this
subsection relating to a school, place of business, or similar nonresidential location shall be sufficiently limited
to protect the stalking victim but shall also protect the defendant's right to employment, education, or the right
to do legitimate business with the employer of a stalking victim as long as the defendant does not have contact
with the stalking victim. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a contact by an attorney regarding
a legal matter.
(5) A restraining order issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of not more than ten (10) years,
the specific duration of which shall be determined by the court. Any restraining order shall be based upon the
seriousness of the facts before the court, the probability of future violations, and the safety of the victim, his or
her immediate family, or both.
(6) Unless the defendant has been convicted of a felony, or is otherwise ineligible to purchase or possess a firearm
under federal law, a restraining order issued pursuant to this section shall not operate as a ban on the purchase
or possession of firearms or ammunition by the defendant.
(7) The restraining order shall be issued on a form prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts and may
be lifted upon application of the stalking victim to the court which granted the order.
(8) Within twenty-four (24) hours of entry of a restraining order or entry of an order rescinding a restraining order,
the circuit clerk shall forward a copy of the order to the Law Information Network of Kentucky (LINK).
(9) A restraining order issued under this section shall be enforced in any county of the Commonwealth. Law
enforcement officers acting in good faith in enforcing a restraining order shall be immune from criminal and
civil liability.
(10) A violation by the defendant of an order issued pursuant to this section shall be a Class A misdemeanor.
Nothing in this section shall preclude the filing of a criminal complaint for stalking based on the same act
which is the basis for the violation of the restraining order].
Section 15. KRS 532.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a defendant is found to be a persistent felony offender, the jury, in lieu of the sentence of imprisonment
assessed under KRS 532.060 for the crime of which the defendant[such person] presently stands convicted,
shall fix a sentence of imprisonment as authorized by subsection (5) or (6) of this section. When a defendant is
charged with being a persistent felony offender, the determination of whether or not he or she is such an
offender and the punishment to be imposed pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall be determined
in a separate proceeding from that proceeding which resulted in his or her last conviction. The[Such]
proceeding shall be conducted before the court sitting with the jury that found the defendant guilty of his or
her most recent offense unless the court for good cause discharges that jury and impanels a new jury for that
purpose.
(2) A persistent felony offender in the second degree is a person who is more than twenty-one (21) years of age
and who stands convicted of a felony after having been convicted of one (1) previous felony. As used in this
provision, a previous felony conviction is a conviction of a felony in this state or conviction of a crime in any
other jurisdiction provided:
(a) That a sentence to a term of imprisonment of one (1) year or more or a sentence to death was imposed
therefor; and
(b) That the offender was over the age of eighteen (18) years at the time the offense was committed; and
(c) That the offender:
1. Completed service of the sentence imposed on the previous felony conviction within five (5)
years prior to the date of commission of the felony for which he or she now stands convicted;[
or]
2. Was on probation, parole, postincarceration supervision, conditional discharge, conditional
release, furlough, appeal bond, or any other form of legal release from any of the previous felony
convictions at the time of commission of the felony for which he or she now stands convicted[;
or]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Was discharged from probation, parole, postincarceration supervision, conditional discharge,
conditional release, or any other form of legal release on any of the previous felony convictions
within five (5) years prior to the date of commission of the felony for which he or she now
stands convicted;[ or]
4. Was in custody from the previous felony conviction at the time of commission of the felony for
which he or she now stands convicted; or
5. Had escaped from custody while serving any of the previous felony convictions at the time of
commission of the felony for which he or she now stands convicted.
(3) A persistent felony offender in the first degree is a person who is more than twenty-one (21) years of age and
who stands convicted of a felony after having been convicted of two (2) or more felonies, or one (1) or more
felony sex crimes against a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, and now stands convicted of any one (1) or more
felonies. As used in this provision, a previous felony conviction is a conviction of a felony in this state or
conviction of a crime in any other jurisdiction provided:
(a) That a sentence to a term of imprisonment of one (1) year or more or a sentence to death was imposed
therefor;[ and]
(b) That the offender was over the age of eighteen (18) years at the time the offense was committed; and
(c) That the offender:
1. Completed service of the sentence imposed on any of the previous felony convictions within five
(5) years prior to the date of the commission of the felony for which he or she now stands
convicted;[ or]
2. Was on probation, parole, postincarceration supervision, conditional discharge, conditional
release, furlough, appeal bond, or any other form of legal release from any of the previous felony
convictions at the time of commission of the felony for which he or she now stands convicted;[
or]
3. Was discharged from probation, parole, postincarceration supervision, conditional discharge,
conditional release, or any other form of legal release on any of the previous felony convictions
within five (5) years prior to the date of commission of the felony for which he or she now
stands convicted;[ or]
4. Was in custody from the previous felony conviction at the time of commission of the felony for
which he or she now stands convicted; or
5. Had escaped from custody while serving any of the previous felony convictions at the time of
commission of the felony for which he or she now stands convicted.
(4) For the purpose of determining whether a person has two (2) or more previous felony convictions, two (2) or
more convictions of crime for which that person served concurrent or uninterrupted consecutive terms of
imprisonment shall be deemed to be only one (1) conviction, unless one (1) of the convictions was for an
offense committed while that person was imprisoned.
(5) A person who is found to be a persistent felony offender in the second degree shall be sentenced to an
indeterminate term of imprisonment pursuant to the sentencing provisions of KRS 532.060(2) for the next
highest degree than the offense for which convicted. A person who is found to be a persistent felony offender
in the second degree shall not be eligible for probation, shock probation, or conditional discharge, unless all
offenses for which the person stands convicted are Class D felony offenses which do not involve a violent act
against a person, in which case probation, shock probation, or conditional discharge may be granted. A violent
offender who is found to be a persistent felony offender in the second degree shall not be eligible for parole
except as provided in KRS 439.3401.
(6) A person who is found to be a persistent felony offender in the first degree shall be sentenced to imprisonment
as follows:
(a) If the offense for which he or she presently stands convicted is a Class A or Class B felony, or if the
person was previously convicted of one (1) or more sex crimes committed against a minor as defined in
KRS 17.500 and presently stands convicted of a subsequent sex crime, a persistent felony offender in
the first degree shall be sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment, the maximum of which

CHAPTER 67 13
shall not be less than twenty (20) years nor more than fifty (50) years, or life imprisonment, or life
imprisonment without parole for twenty-five (25) years for a sex crime committed against a minor;
(b) If the offense for which he or she presently stands convicted is a Class C or Class D felony, a persistent
felony offender in the first degree shall be sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment, the
maximum of which shall not be less than ten (10) years nor more than twenty (20) years.
(7) A person who is found to be a persistent felony offender in the first degree shall not be eligible for probation,
shock probation, or conditional discharge, unless all offenses for which the person stands convicted are Class
D felony offenses which do not involve a violent act against a person or a sex crime as that term is defined in
KRS 17.500, in which case, probation, shock probation, or conditional discharge may be granted. If the
offense the person presently stands convicted of is a Class A, B, or C felony, the person shall not be eligible
for parole until the person has served a minimum term of incarceration of not less than ten (10) years, unless
another sentencing scheme applies. A violent offender who is found to be a persistent felony offender in the
first degree shall not be eligible for parole except as provided in KRS 439.3401.
(8) A conviction, plea of guilty, or Alford plea under KRS 218A.1415 shall not trigger the application of this
section, regardless of the number or type of prior felony convictions that may have been entered against the
defendant. A conviction, plea of guilty, or Alford plea under KRS 218A.1415 may be used as a prior felony
offense allowing this section to be applied if he or she is subsequently convicted of a different felony offense.
(9) The provisions of this section amended by 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 396, sec. 11, shall be retroactive.
(10) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, this section shall not apply to a person convicted
of a criminal offense if the penalty for that offense was increased from a misdemeanor to a felony, or
from a lower felony classification to a higher felony classification, because the conviction constituted a
second or subsequent violation of that offense.
(b) This subsection shall not prohibit the application of this section to a person convicted of:
1. A felony offense arising out of KRS 189A.010, 189A.090, 506.140, 508.032, Section 1 of this
Act[508.140], or 510.015; or
2. Any other felony offense if the penalty was not enhanced to a higher level because the
Commonwealth elected to prosecute the person as a first-time violator of that offense.
Section 16. The following KRS sections are repealed:
508.140 Stalking in the first degree.
508.150 Stalking in the second degree.
Section 17. This Act shall not affect the validity of:
(1) A restraining order or interpersonal protective order issued under KRS 508.155 prior to the effective
date of this Act. All such orders shall retain the full force of law for the 10-year period following the date of issuance.
Upon renewal of a restraining order issued under Section 14 of this Act, it shall be converted to an interpersonal
protective order under KRS Chapter 456; or
(2) A domestic violence order issued under KRS Chapter 403 or an interpersonal protective order issued
under KRS Chapter 456 prior to the effective date of this Act where the basis of the petition was stalking.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version